Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5117
Investments authorized under more than one provision.

An insurer may hold an investment authorized under more than one provision of the Insurers Investment Act under the provision of its choice except as otherwise expressly provided by law. Nothing in the act shall prevent an insurer from holding an investment under a provision different from the one under which it previously held the investment except as otherwise expressly provided by law.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 17;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 8.